Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB69.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Recovery-to-work Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." A board established under 29 U.S.C. § 3122 (relating to local workforce development boards)."Business partner." A business entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Educational institution." The term includes:(1) Postsecondary career and technical centers and colleges of technology accredited by the Department of Education.(2) Community colleges as established under Article XIX-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, or the act of August 24, 1963 (P.L.1132, No.484), known as the Community College Act of 1963.20250SB0069PN0102 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Private licensed schools regulated under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."Individuals in recovery." Individuals diagnosed with and recovering from a drug or alcohol substance use disorder."Local pilot program." A local pilot program under Chapter 3."Local workforce development board." A local workforce development board established in accordance with 29 U.S.C. § 3122."Participating agencies." Includes:(1) The Department of Health of the Commonwealth.(2) The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.(3) The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs of the Commonwealth.(4) The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth.(5) The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth.(6) The Pennsylvania Parole Board.(7) The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Program partners." Entities that participate in a local pilot program."Recovery-to-work." The program established in section 301(a)."Support services provider." An entity that provides drug and alcohol treatment or recovery supports.CHAPTER 3RECOVERY-TO-WORK20250SB0069PN0102 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 301. Program established.(a) Establishment.--Recovery-to-work is established as a pilot program within the department.(b) Funding sources.--To implement this act, the department may utilize any of the following:(1) Money deposited into the Reemployment Fund.(2) Existing money appropriated to the department, if the use of the money for Recovery-to-work is consistent with law.(3) Money appropriated to any participating agency for Recovery-to-work.(4) Money appropriated from the Opioid Settlement Restricted Account for Recovery-to-work.(c) Notice.--Upon the initial appropriation of sufficient money to carry out the provisions of this act or a determination by the department that sufficient money is available from another existing source to carry out the provisions of this act, the department shall transmit notice of the appropriation to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(d) Administration.--Recovery-to-work shall be administered by the department to empower local workforce development boards, support services providers, business partners and participating agencies to collaboratively develop innovative local pilot programs to do all the following:(1) Provide individuals in recovery with career development opportunities and work experience.(2) Provide individuals in recovery with employability and career readiness skill training as identified by the department in consultation with the Department of Education.20250SB0069PN0102 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Provide individuals in recovery with support services for their continued recovery.(4) Provide local workforce development boards with the funding necessary to support program partners and business partners implementing innovative local pilot programs.(5) Provide program partners with informational resources to help them conduct successful local pilot programs.(6) Seek to identify other funding sources, including Federal grants, which may support local pilot programs.Section 302. Participation in Recovery-to-work.(a) Eligibility.--A local workforce development board shall be eligible to apply for funding. The department shall establish priority workforce areas based on substance use and unemployment statistics.(b) Guidelines.--The department, in consultation with participating agencies, shall develop guidelines that specify the requirements for participation in Recovery-to-work.(c) Occupational focus.--Local pilot programs must be focused on providing individuals in recovery with job training and work experience that will prepare individuals in recovery for continued success for job opportunities that exist in their local workforce development areas.Section 303. Application and approval process.(a) Application.--An eligible local workforce development board under section 302(a) may submit an application to the department requesting approval for participation in Recovery-to-work.(b) Application requirements.--A completed application must describe the proposed local pilot program in the form and manner 20250SB0069PN0102 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prescribed by the department. An application must include all of the following:(1) A list of program partners, including participation by a support services provider and a declaration of interest by at least two business partners. The program partners may include educational institutions, nonprofit business-support entities, job seeker support entities, registered apprenticeship programs and economic development agencies.(2) A description of how the proposed local pilot program will meet the guidelines under section 302(b).(3) A projection of costs associated with the proposed local pilot program, including an enumeration of opportunities to leverage other funding and programming resources.(4) Information on occupations that will be the focus of the proposed local pilot program, including data on local demand.(5) Information on industry-recognized credentials or certifications awarded to program participants upon completion.(6) Documentation of interest by a business partner that plans to receive the incentive under section 701.(7) A start date for the proposed local pilot program.(8) A list of clear objectives and measurable goals that the proposed local pilot program will seek to achieve.(9) Documentation of an agreement among the program partners describing the role of each program partner within the proposed local pilot program and the expectations that each program partner agrees to fulfill.(c) Approval process.--20250SB0069PN0102 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board as needed, shall approve up to seven local pilot programs for participation in Recovery-to-work in the first year after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Priority must be given to a proposed local pilot program demonstrating one or more of the following characteristics:(i) Substantial program integration across educational levels, including use of multiple components identified in the department guidelines under section 302(b).(ii) An ability to leverage other funding and programming resources.(iii) A commitment from one or more business partners to provide preferred interviews to individuals in recovery completing the local pilot program.(iv) Capability to provide exposure to high-priority or in-demand occupations as identified by the department.(d) Contractual relationship.--Within 30 days of the completion of the approval process, the department shall enter into a contract with each local workforce development board approved for participation in Recovery-to-work. The contract shall require the signatories to provide the services described in the approved application from money appropriated or distributed for this purpose or from money identified by the participating agencies in accordance with section 301(d)(6).(e) Termination and replacement.--The department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board as needed, may terminate a local pilot program for failure to comply with program requirements. Consistent with the process in 20250SB0069PN0102 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (c), a replacement local pilot program may be approved.Section 304. Program operation.(a) Cooperative management.--In collaboration with the participating agencies and the board, the department shall:(1) Manage the operation of Recovery-to-work.(2) Establish an application process.(3) Enumerate outcome-based metrics by which local pilot programs will be evaluated under Chapter 9.(4) Institute guidelines and procedures as necessary to implement Recovery-to-work. The guidelines must enumerate allowed and disallowed expenses and provide that administrative expenses over 5% shall be disallowed.(b) Informational resources.--In collaboration with the participating agencies and the board, the department shall provide informational resources to help program partners conduct successful local pilot programs.(c) Distribution.--The department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board, as needed, shall determine the distribution of available money from money appropriated for the purposes of this act.CHAPTER 7INCENTIVESSection 701. Business partner incentives.(a) Eligibility.--Subject to the availability of funding under subsection (c), if, at the end of a training period, a business partner hires an individual in recovery for a job opening, the business partner is eligible to receive an incentive payment in the amount of $1,250 if all of the following occur:20250SB0069PN0102 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The individual in recovery remains employed an average of 35 hours per week for 26 consecutive weeks.(2) The individual in recovery earns wages that meet or exceed the negotiated performance measure for the local workforce development board for median earnings the second quarter after exiting the Adult program authorized under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128, 128 Stat. 1425).(b) Application.--A business partner may apply for an incentive payment under subsection (a). The application form shall be prescribed and furnished by the department and bear the notarized signature of the applicant.(c) Funding.--(1) Incentive payments under subsection (a) shall be paid from money appropriated for payment.(2) Fifteen percent of the total amount of money authorized for a fiscal year shall be reserved for business partners with fewer than 100 employees. If the reserved amount is not committed by April 30 of each year, the reserved amount shall be available to business partners that have at least 100 employees.(d) Penalty.--A business partner that falsifies an application for an incentive payment shall be required to refund the department the total amount of the incentive payment awarded.CHAPTER 9PERFORMANCE EVALUATION AND REPORTINGSection 901. Performance evaluation system.The department shall develop and implement an evaluation and performance improvement system which does the following:20250SB0069PN0102 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Collects critical information on an annual basis or more frequently as determined by the department, including:(i) Skill training being received by individuals in recovery.(ii) Challenges foreseen by business partners.(iii) Local pilot program best practices.(iv) Retention rate of individuals in recovery employed as a result of a local pilot program.(2) Defines the benefits of Recovery-to-work and its effects on business partners and individuals in recovery.Section 902. Annual report.Within 60 days of the end of a fiscal year in which a local pilot program is in operation, the department, participating agencies and the board shall jointly submit a report regarding the implementation of Recovery-to-work and the local pilot programs over the previous fiscal year to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The Auditor General.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.20250SB0069PN0102 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 903. Final report.Within six months of the expiration of local recovery-to-work pilot programs, the department, participating agencies and the board shall jointly submit a report regarding the implementation of Recovery-to-work and the local pilot programs to the following:(1) The Governor.(2) The Auditor General.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(5) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the Senate.(6) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Education Committee of the House of Representatives.(7) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate.(8) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 904. Report contents.(a) General rule.--In addition to information or analysis required by the department, in consultation with participating agencies and the board, as needed, the interim and final reports must include information about each local pilot program, including whether:(1) The local pilot program achieved the clear objectives and measurable goals proposed under section 303(b)(8).(2) An analysis of each local pilot program according to 20250SB0069PN0102 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the outcome-based metrics enumerated by the department under section 304(a)(3).(3) The number of participating individuals in recovery.(4) The amount expended.(b) Best practices.--The reports must identify best practices observed from among the most successful local pilot programs.CHAPTER 21MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2101. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0069PN0102 - 12 - 1234567891011